District of Columbia statutes.
5-1411

Delivery of body; expenses.

(a)

Following investigation or autopsy, the CME shall release the body of the decedent to the person having the right to the body for the purpose of burial or other disposition pursuant to law. If after a reasonable time, established by regulation by the Mayor, no authorized person claims the body of the decedent, the CME shall dispose of the body in accordance with the law.

(b)

Expenses of transportation of bodies and autopsies performed pursuant to this chapter shall be borne by the District of Columbia.

(c)

Only the CME shall dispose unclaimed bodies in the District without of next of kin or other means of disposition. The Mayor shall prescribe fees and regulations for the storage and disposal of unclaimed bodies.

Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 2912, 47 DCR 6308
1981 Ed., § 11-2308.
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2912 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).
Delegation of Authority Pursuant to Title XXIX of D.C. Law 13-172, the “Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Act of 2000” Creating the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner, see Mayor’s Order 2001-04, January 5, 2001 ( 48 DCR 938).